Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-8,113
Interstate bridges; closing; barricades; detours.

After giving the notice required by section 39-8,112, the party authorized to close the whole or any part of any interstate bridge shall, before closing any part of such bridge, erect suitable barricades and make provision for any necessary detours in the manner provided by sections 39-1345 to 39-1347.

Laws 1959, c. 175, § 23, p. 641.